Utah statutes.
53B-8a-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Account agreement" means an agreement between an account owner and the
Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust entered into under this chapter.
(2)  "Account owner" means a person, estate, or trust, if that person, estate,
or trust has entered into an account agreement under this chapter to save for
the higher education costs on behalf of a beneficiary.
(3)  "Administrative fund" means the moneys used to administer the Utah
Educational Savings Plan Trust.
(4)  "Beneficiary" means the individual designated in an account agreement to
benefit from the amount saved for higher education costs.
(5)  "Board" means the board of directors of the Utah Educational Savings Plan
Trust which is the state Board of Regents acting in its capacity as the Utah
Higher Education Assistance Authority under Title 53B, Chapter 12.
(6)  "Endowment fund" means the endowment fund established under Section 53B-
8a-107 which is held as a separate fund within the Utah Educational Savings
Plan Trust.
(7)  "Higher education costs" means qualified higher education expenses as
defined in Section 529(e)(3), Internal Revenue Code.
(8)  "Program administrator" means the administrator of the Utah Educational
Savings Plan Trust appointed by the board to administer and manage the Utah
Educational Savings Plan Trust.
(9)  "Program fund" means the program fund created under Section 53B-8a-107,
which is held as a separate fund within the Utah Educational Savings Plan
Trust.
(10)  "Qualified investment" means an amount invested in accordance with an
account agreement established under this chapter.
(11)  "Tuition and fees" means the quarterly or semester charges imposed to
attend an institution of higher education and required as a condition of
enrollment.
(12)  "Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust" means the Utah Educational Savings
Plan Trust created under Section 53B-8a-103.
